Massachusetts, session 194th, H4133.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Purpose
The purpose of this Act is to allow the Town of Lexington to prohibit or restrict the use
of Second-Generation anticoagulant rodenticides under a future bylaw approved by Town
Meeting.
SECTION 2.Notwithstanding Chapter 132B of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the Town of Lexington may, by bylaw, prohibit or restrict the
application of second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides within the Town of Lexington,
including the application of such pesticides by licensed commercial applicators as defined in 333
C.M.R. 10.00.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon passage.
of 1